South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4160.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Division of judicial circuits, certain at-large judges converted to resident SECTION 1.    Section 14-5-610 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 14-5-610.    (A) The State is divided into sixteen judicial circuits as follows: (1) The first circuit is composed of the counties of Calhoun, Dorchester, and Orangeburg. (2) The second circuit is composed of the counties of Aiken, Bamberg, and Barnwell. (3) The third circuit is composed of the counties of Clarendon, Lee, Sumter, and Williamsburg. (4) The fourth circuit is composed of the counties of Chesterfield, Darlington, Marlboro, and Dillon. (5) The fifth circuit is composed of the counties of Kershaw and Richland. (6) The sixth circuit is composed of the counties of Chester, Lancaster, and Fairfield. (7) The seventh circuit is composed of the counties of Cherokee and Spartanburg. (8) The eighth circuit is composed of the counties of Abbeville, Greenwood, Laurens, and Newberry. (9) The ninth circuit is composed of the counties of Charleston and Berkeley. (10) The tenth circuit is composed of the counties of Anderson and Oconee. (11) The eleventh circuit is composed of the counties of Lexington, McCormick, Saluda, and Edgefield. (12) The twelfth circuit is composed of the counties of Florence and Marion. (13) The thirteenth circuit is composed of the counties of Greenville and Pickens. (14) The fourteenth circuit is composed of the counties of Allendale, Hampton, Colleton, Jasper, and Beaufort. (15) The fifteenth circuit is composed of the counties of Georgetown and Horry. (16) The sixteenth circuit is composed of the counties of York and Union. (B) One judge must be elected from the sixth circuit. Two judges must be elected from the first, second, fourth, eighth, tenth, and sixteenth circuits. Three judges must be elected from the third, seventh, eleventh, twelfth, fourteenth, and fifteenth circuits. Five judges must be elected from the fifth, ninth, and thirteenth circuits. (C) In addition to the above judges authorized by this section, there must be seven additional circuit judges elected by the General Assembly from the State at large for terms of office of six years. These additional judges must be elected without regard to county or circuit of residence. Each office of the at-large judges is a separate office and is assigned numerical designations of Seat No. 1 through Seat No. 7, respectively. Certain at-large judges converted to resident SECTION 2.    (A) Upon the effective date of this act: (1) At-large Circuit Court Seat 1 is converted to a resident seat and designated Third Circuit Court Seat 3; (2) At-large Circuit Court Seat 4 is converted to a resident seat and designated Thirteenth Circuit Court Seat 5; (3) At-large Circuit Court Seats 6 and 12 are converted to resident seats and designated Twelfth Circuit Court Seats 2 and 3, respectively; (4) At-large Circuit Court Seats 8 and 10 are converted to resident seats and designated Fifth Circuit Court Seats 4 and 5, respectively; (5) At-large Circuit Court Seat 9 is converted to a resident seat and designated Ninth Circuit Court Seat 5; (6) At-large Circuit Court Seat 13 is converted to a resident seat and designated Eleventh Circuit Court Seat 3; and (7) At-large Circuit Court Seat 14 is converted to a resident seat and designated Seventh Circuit Court Seat 3. (B) Nothing in this act may be construed to require a judge currently serving in an at-large circuit court seat which is converted to a resident circuit court seat pursuant to this act to undergo additional screening until the end of the term for which they were screened and duly elected to an at-large circuit court seat. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 8th day of May, 2025. Approved the 12th day of May, 2025. __________